Alaska statutes. Title 19. Highways and Ferries.
Article 3. General Provisions.

Sec. 19.75.911.
Exemption from local regulation.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, the activities of the authority are exempt from land use planning, zoning, permitting, or other similar governmental powers of political subdivisions of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 77 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.90.911. Renumbered in 2003.

Sec. 19.75.915.
Liability for payment of tolls and other charges.

The owner of a vehicle using a bridge or facility managed by the authority for which a toll, fee, rate, or other charge is imposed is liable for the payment of the toll, fee, rate, or other charge solely because of the vehicle ownership, unless the vehicle, except a rental vehicle, is used without the owner’s knowledge and incurs the toll, fee, rate, or other charge during operation.

History.

(§ 9 ch 60 SLA 2006; am § 10 ch 51 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, substituted “vehicle using a bridge or facility” for “vehicle using a facility owned, controlled, or”, and three times inserted “, rate, or other charge” following “fee”, made related changes.

Sec. 19.75.920.
Statutory construction. [Repealed, § 13 ch 51 SLA 2014.]

Sec. 19.75.980.
Definitions.

In this chapter, except as otherwise provided and unless the context requires otherwise,

“authority” means the Knik Arm Bridge and Toll Authority;

“board” means the board of directors of the authority;

“department” means the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities;

[Repealed, § 22 ch 61 SLA 2015.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 77 SLA 2003; am § 10 ch 60 SLA 2006; am § 61 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.90.980. Renumbered in 2003.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, repealed (4).

Sec. 19.75.990.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Knik Arm Bridge and Toll Authority Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 77 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.90.990. Renumbered in 2003.